North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-27 Dairy Promotion Commission [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-27-01.
Title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-02.
Purposes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-03.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-04.
North Dakota dairy promotion commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-05.
Powers and duties of commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-06.
Assessment — Appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-07.
Dealers’, processors’, and producers’ records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-08.
Reports. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-09.
Expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-10.
Security bonds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-11.
Biennial report and audit of commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-27-12.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.